Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.1002

Nonjudicial dissolution.

Except as otherwise provided in RCW 23.100.1003 and 23.95.615, a limited cooperative association is dissolved and its activities must be wound up:

(1) Upon the occurrence of an event or at a time specified in the articles of organization;

(2) Upon the action of the association's organizers, board of directors, or members under RCW 23.100.1004 or 23.100.1005; or

(3) Ninety days after the dissociation of a member, which results in the association having one patron member and no other members, unless the association:

(a) Has a sole member that is a cooperative; or

(b) Not later than the end of the ninety-day period, admits at least one member in accordance with the organic rules and has at least two members, at least one of which is a patron member.

[ 2019 c 37 s 1002.]